Tennessee, session 114, HB0380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2206, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection (e) and redesignating the existing subsection (e) accordingly:
(e)
(1) All virtual schools shall use a curriculum and instructional materials
that meet or exceed the academic standards adopted by the state board of
education. Notwithstanding subsection (a), the state board of education shall not
waive this restriction for a virtual school.
(2) The state textbook and instructional materials quality commission
shall adopt a procedure to receive and evaluate feedback from a resident of this
state that virtual school curriculum or instructional materials do not meet or
exceed the academic standards adopted by the state board of education.
(3) If the commission receives feedback according to the procedure
established pursuant to subdivision (e)(2), then the commission shall evaluate
and determine, within sixty (60) days from the date on which the feedback was
received, whether the virtual school curriculum or instructional materials meet or
exceed the academic standards adopted by the state board of education. The
commission shall issue the commission's determination in writing to each LEA
that operates a virtual school. If the textbook commission determines that a
virtual school curriculum or instructional materials do not meet or exceed the
HB0380
001258
- 1 -

academic standards adopted by the state board of education, then a virtual
school using that curriculum or instructional materials shall cease using such
curriculum or instructional materials and substitute a curriculum and or
instructional materials that meet or exceed the academic standards adopted by
the state board of education.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001258